Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF HASTINGS WATER TREATMENT PLANT; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $45,700,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the clean water fund to the Public Facilities Authority for a grant to the city of Hastings to predesign, design, construct, and equip the Eastern Water Treatment Plant and associated piping to remove perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) and nitrates from city drinking water and to interconnect the Minnesota Veterans Home. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end